Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 52 GROUND WATER DISTRICTS
§ 42-5244B. Delinquent assessments — Noncompliance with mitigation plan.

A water user who is delinquent in the payment of any assessment under this chapter, or who has failed to comply with any apportionment of mitigation obligations imposed by the board under this chapter, shall not be entitled to divert ground water until such delinquent assessment is paid in full and noncompliance is remedied in full. To commence enforcement, the district shall submit to the director a report documenting the delinquent assessment or noncompliance with the apportionment of mitigation plan obligations. For delinquent assessments, the report shall contain an accounting of the basis for the assessment, the apportionment of those assessments among district members, and the ground water user’s delinquency in the payment of those assessments. For noncompliance with the apportionment of mitigation plan obligations, the report shall identify the mitigation plan under which the mitigation plan obligations were apportioned, explain the basis for the apportionment of those obligations among district members, and document the water user’s noncompliance with the apportioned mitigation obligations. If, after the director analyzes information in the report, the director concludes that the district has reasonably apportioned those assessments based on the factors set forth in section 42-5232(7), Idaho Code, or has reasonably apportioned those mitigation plan obligations based on the factors set forth in section 42-5244A, Idaho Code, the director shall instruct the water master to curtail all ground water diversions by the water user for which assessments are delinquent or for which the user has not complied with the mitigation obligations apportioned to the user. Any person aggrieved by the action of the director and who has not previously been afforded an opportunity for a hearing on the matter shall be entitled to a hearing before the director to contest the action pursuant to section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code. No district shall commence enforcement under the provisions of this section prior to January 1, 2020. The director shall not curtail ground water diversions based on delinquent assessments levied prior to April 1, 2019, or based on mitigation plan noncompliance that occurred prior to April 1, 2019.

§ 42-5245. Petition for annexation of land.

Any ground water user, as defined in section 42-5201(8), Idaho Code, as well as any user of ground water for domestic or stock use as defined by sections 42-111 and 42-1401A, Idaho Code, may file with the board a petition in writing praying that the land and/or facilities listed under the ground water user’s ground water right(s) may be annexed into the district. The petition shall contain a legal description of the lands and any other information the district may require, and the petitioner shall state under oath that petitioner holds the title to said lands. If the ground water user is a nonirrigator, the petition shall state if the ground water user is seeking to join the district solely to participate in the district’s mitigation plans and other mitigation activities.

§ 42-5246. Notice of petition.

The board secretary shall cause a notice of the filing of such petition to be published in the manner of notices of elections. The notice shall state the filing of such petition, and the name of the petitioner, a description of the lands mentioned in the said petition, and it shall notify all persons interested in or that may be affected by such change of boundaries of the district, to appear at the office of said board, at a time named in said notice, and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the lands mentioned should not be annexed to said district. The petitioner shall advance to the secretary sufficient money to pay the estimated costs of all proceedings under this chapter.

§ 42-5247. Hearing on petition.

The board, at the time mentioned in said notice or at such other time to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall hear the petition and all the objections thereto. The failure of any person to appear and object shall be taken as an assent on his part to a change of the boundaries of the district as requested in the petition, or to such a change thereof as will include a part of the lands.

§ 42-5248. Assessments against annexed lands.

The board of directors may require, as a condition to the granting of an annexation petition, that the petitioners shall severally pay to the district such respective sums, as nearly as the same can be estimated, as said petitioners, or their grantors, would have been required to pay such district, had such lands been included in such district at the time it was originally formed, together with a proportionate share of the expenses of the district accrued since formation.

If the petition of a nonirrigator seeks only to participate in the district’s mitigation plans and other mitigation activities, the board may require a proportionate sum of the mitigation expenses accrued since the district was originally formed to be paid as a condition to the granting of an annexation petition.

§ 42-5249. Order accepting or rejecting petition.

If the board of directors deems a proposed annexation not to be in the best interests of the district to include the lands mentioned in the petition, the board shall reject the petition. But if they deem it for the best interest of the district, the board may order the lands mentioned in the petition or some part thereof be annexed to the district.

The order shall describe the lands to be annexed to said district and the board may cause a survey thereof to be made if deemed necessary. Thereafter the annexed land shall be subject to such assessments from time to time as the board of directors shall deem right under the circumstances, and such assessments shall be deemed to be assessments for benefits to said lands by reason of their annexation to said district. The directors shall state on their minutes at their next regular meeting which division and election precinct in said district the said lands so annexed shall be attached, and, if necessary, the board shall make an order redividing the district into divisions and election precincts, in the same manner and to like effect, as near as may be, as provided for that purpose on the formation of a district.

§ 42-5250. Order to be recorded.

Upon a change of the boundaries of a district becoming effective, a copy of the order of the board of directors ordering such change, certified by the president and secretary of the board, shall be filed for record in the recorder’s office of each county within which are situated any of the lands of the district, and thereupon the district shall be and remain a ground water district, as fully and to every intent and purpose as if the lands which are included in the district by the change of the boundaries had been included therein at the original organization of the district.

§ 42-5251. Petition for exclusion of lands — Ground water irrigated lands — Lands of nonirrigator — Lands may remain in the district for mitigation purposes.

Any district member who is an irrigator may file with the district board a petition requesting that the member’s irrigated lands be excluded from the district. The petition may request that the lands either be excluded for all purposes or be excluded for all purposes except mitigation. The petition shall be signed by each petitioner, and shall state that continued inclusion of the irrigated lands in the district is inappropriate or unwarranted:

Because the diversions of ground water under the ground water irrigator’s water right have no depletive effect on any water source, either individually or cumulatively when considered in conjunction with other similar diversions;

Because the only ground water use associated with the lands sought to be excluded by the petition is a domestic or stock water use as defined by sections 42-111 and 42-1401A, Idaho Code;

Because the exclusion of the lands will not impair the district’s ability to repay debt or carry out mitigation plans;

Because the exclusion is in the best interests of the district and its members; or

For other compelling reasons.

Any district member who is a nonirrigator, may file with the district board a petition requesting that the member’s lands be excluded from the district. The petition may request that the lands either be excluded for all purposes or be excluded for all purposes except mitigation. The petition shall be signed by each petitioner, but need not be acknowledged. The board shall consider the petition and grant or deny the petition within ninety (90) days of the date it is filed, unless the board, in its sole discretion, grants a hearing on the petition within such time period, in which case the board shall issue a final decision within sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the hearing.

All costs incurred by the district in carrying out an exclusion proceeding shall be assessed as provided in section 42-5253, Idaho Code. A person purchasing land under a written contract shall be deemed to be the owner of that land for purposes of this section.

The board shall consider the petition and, based on findings concerning such factors, the board shall grant or deny the petition within ninety (90) days of the date it is filed, unless the board, in its sole discretion, grants a hearing on the petition within such time period, in which case the board shall issue a final decision within sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the hearing.

§ 42-5252. Contents of petition — Representations, certification and liability — Waiver of benefits upon exclusion.

A petition for exclusion shall set forth or include the following:

A description of the land and/or facilities of petitioner for which exclusion is requested, together with such evidence of ownership of the land and/or facilities as is satisfactory to the district board;

A representation that no mortgagee or other person holds a lien of record in the county where the land for which exclusion is requested is located, for which the lienholder’s consent to the exclusion is required or that, if such consent is required, the consent has been granted by the lienholder;

If the member seeks exclusion for all purposes, an explicit written waiver and relinquishment, on a form provided by the board or otherwise, of all right to rely upon or be covered by any program, plan, activity or benefits of any kind provided by or through the district;

If the member seeks to be excluded from the district for all purposes except mitigation, an explicit written waiver and relinquishment stating that the member recognizes and agrees that:

The member no longer will be entitled to vote or participate in the governance of the district, to nominate directors, or to serve as a director of the district except as specified in this chapter;

The member will remain subject to all assessments pertaining to the district’s mitigation program(s) or plans;

The member will be entitled to receive no benefits of any kind from the district except those pertaining to mitigation purposes.

Regardless of whether the exclusion will be for all purposes or for all except mitigation purposes, an explicit written statement, on a form provided by the board or otherwise, that the member recognizes and agrees that he will remain liable to the district, and subject to assessment, for any financial indebtedness the member may have to the district for indebtedness incurred before exclusion occurs.

The district board shall return to the petitioner any petition not accompanied by the information required in subsection (1) of this section, and no further action shall be required of the board with respect to such petition. The petitioner shall be liable for any expenses or damages to lienholders or to other landowners or to the district resulting directly or indirectly from wrongful exclusion of lands by reason of untrue or incorrect statements in the petition.

The petition for exclusion shall be signed by the member and be acknowledged in front of a notary public in the same manner as for deeds of land.

§ 42-5253. Order of exclusion.

In the event the district’s board of directors grants a petition for exclusion, the board shall, by resolution, make an order forthwith excluding the lands described in the petition either for all purposes or for only those purposes not related to mitigation. No hearing is required prior to granting a petition for exclusion.

At a minimum, the order of exclusion shall specify that:

Lands excluded for all purposes shall not be a part of or be entitled to receive any benefits from the district;

Lands excluded only for purposes not related to mitigation, shall continue to be part of the district for mitigation purposes only and shall be assessed for these purposes as provided under this chapter;

Any excluded lands are subject to the requirements of section 42-5257, Idaho Code.

When the petition is filed on or before December 1 in any calendar year, any assessment, other than those specified in section 42-5257, Idaho Code, against the land for any calendar year subsequent to the year in which the petition was filed shall not be valid and no lien for any such attempted assessment shall attach under section 42-5240, Idaho Code.

§ 42-5254. Survey of land to be excluded.

The board of directors may cause any survey to be made it deems necessary for the purpose of determining the change in the district by reason of an exclusion or proposed exclusion. If the land described in the petition is described in accordance with the public survey or in accordance with a plat approved, filed and recorded as provided by law, the cost of survey shall be borne by the district, otherwise the cost shall be borne by petitioner.

§ 42-5255. Costs of excluding land.

The costs of excluding any land as provided in this chapter shall be borne by the petitioner or petitioners except as provided in section 42-5254, Idaho Code. The board may require a deposit of the estimated costs before granting the petition. If the actual costs of completing the exclusion of the lands from the district are less than the amount deposited by the petitioner, the balance shall be refunded to the petitioner within fourteen (14) days after the final action for the exclusion is completed. If the actual costs of the exclusion of the lands is more than the deposit, the difference shall be paid to the district by the petitioner within fourteen (14) days after receipt of a statement to that effect from the district, and the board’s order of exclusion shall not be effective until the difference is paid.

§ 42-5256. Changes to be filed for record.

Any decision and order of the board of directors or the district court, in case of appeal, excluding the petitioner’s land and changing the boundaries of such ground water district shall be filed for record in the recorder’s office of the county or counties within which are situated the lands of such ground water district.

§ 42-5257. Exclusion — Effect — Obligations outstanding — Enforcement — Payment — Certificate.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, land and/or facilities excluded from any ground water district shall not thereafter be entitled to any of the rights and benefits of the district and shall be deemed to have fully relinquished all such rights and benefits.

Land and/or facilities fully excluded from a district and those excluded only from nonmitigation purposes shall be subject to assessment and be otherwise chargeable for the payment and discharge of all obligations outstanding at the time of the entry of the exclusion order as fully as though the land had not been excluded. Such obligations shall include, but are not limited to, their proportionate share of any of the district’s existing indebtedness that was incurred for a project or activity that: (a) provided a benefit to such lands prior to the exclusion and for which benefit the excluded lands remain indebted; or (b) continues to benefit such lands even after the exclusion. Where either of these circumstances exists, excluded lands shall remain a part of the district for the purpose of discharging such existing contract indebtedness, and otherwise shall be obligated to pay all regular and special assessments to retire such debt as if they had not been excluded. The district’s board of directors may allow any debt or obligation against any excluded land and/or facility to be paid in installments or in any other manner the board deems equitable.

All provisions which could be used to compel the payment by excluded land of its portion of the outstanding obligations had the exclusion not occurred, may be used to compel the payment on the part of the land of the portion of the outstanding obligations of the district for which it is liable.

When any member obtaining the exclusion of land from a ground water district has paid to the district all of the debts and obligations of the district assessable, chargeable or allocable to the land and/or facility excluded, the district may issue its certificate of full payment executed by the president and secretary of the district, and acknowledged so that the certificate may be recorded in the records of the county wherein the land is situate.

§ 42-5258. Reinstatement of lands.

Where lands have been excluded from a ground water district they may be reinstated to the district by following the procedures provided in sections 42-5245 through 42-5250, Idaho Code, except that the board of directors, in its discretion, may refuse for any reason to annex such lands to the district.

§ 42-5259. Participation by nonmember in district solely for mitigation purposes.

Upon written request from any ground water user who is not a member of a district, a district board of directors may enter a contract with such nonmember pursuant to which the nonmember shall be allowed to participate fully in, and obtain all benefits of, any mitigation plan, purpose or activity the district currently has in force or is developing, pursuant to terms and conditions acceptable to both parties, provided that:

The board finds that the plan is likely to be effective in mitigating the effects of such nonmember’s ground water use, and that including the nonmember within the mitigation plan’s coverage will not impair the plan’s effectiveness as to district members;

If the district’s mitigation plan has been approved by the director, the board shall evaluate the contract request in accordance with any conditions of the district’s mitigation plan which address equitable participation by ground water users who do not initially participate in such mitigation plan;

Before the contract may be effective, the board may collect from the nonmember a payment adequate to compensate the district for the nonmember’s proportional share of the costs the district already has incurred in developing and implementing the mitigation plan;

The board may include in the contract a provision requiring the nonmember to pay a reasonable surcharge, either annually or on some other basis, to reimburse the district for such nonmember’s proportional share of those past or future costs of operating the district attributable to formulating or implementing the mitigation plan or plans in which the nonmember is participating;

The board may require the nonmember to provide security to assure the payment of all assessments and charges related to the contract.

§ 42-5260. Petition to annex state land.

The state board of land commissioners may, by resolution duly passed at any meeting of such state board and recorded in its minutes, after due consideration in each specific case, authorize the governor of the state of Idaho, as chairman of the board of land commissioners, to sign a petition for the annexation of adjacent Idaho state lands to a district, or sign a petition to exclude such state lands from a district. The governor shall be deemed the owner of such state lands for the purpose of signing any petition herein authorized, with like effect as the owner of private lands.

§ 42-5261. Petition for dissolution of district.

Whenever a majority of the members entitled and qualified to vote in district elections so desire, they may petition the board to call a special election to submit to the qualified district electors a proposal to vote on the dissolution of the district. The petition shall set forth the reasons for such proposal. The petition for dissolution of the district shall state that all the district’s outstanding legal and enforceable obligations of every nature whatsoever have been fully satisfied and paid or shall set forth facts showing reasonable grounds for the belief that the consent of the holders of all such district obligations can be obtained, or that the district is able to satisfy all those not consenting.

§ 42-5262. Call for election on dissolution petition.

It shall be the duty of the said board of directors, if it approves the dissolution petition, to call an election in accordance with section 34-106, Idaho Code, for the purpose of submitting to the qualified electors of the district the proposal for dissolution of the district.

§ 42-5263. Notice of dissolution election.

Notice of such election must be given by posting notices in five (5) public places in each election precinct in said district at least four (4) weeks before the date of said election and by the publication thereof for the same length of time in some newspaper published in each county in which the district or any part thereof is located. Such notice must specify the time and place of holding such election.

§ 42-5264. Conduct of dissolution election. — An election on a dissolution petition shall be held in all respects as near as practicable in conformity with the provisions of sections 42-5211 through 42-5213, Idaho Code. Those district members who are qualified to vote pursuant to section 42-5210(1), Idaho Code, shall be entitled to vote in the dissolution election. Upon the ballots used at such elections shall be written or printed “For Dissolution—Yes” and “For Dissolution

No,” depending upon the nature of the proposal to be voted upon. Each member qualified to vote in the election shall cast a number of votes in proportion to that user’s cubic feet per second of ground water rights.

§ 42-5265. Canvass of returns on election for dissolution.

On the first Monday after any such election the board of directors of the district shall meet at its usual place of meeting to canvass the returns, and when they shall have declared the result the secretary shall make full entry in his record.

§ 42-5266. Petition for confirmation of dissolution by district court.

Immediately after such election, in case the proposal has carried by a vote of members representing a majority of the ground water rights in the district, measured by cubic feet per second, the board shall file in the district court of the county in which the district’s office is situated a petition praying in effect that the proceedings for the dissolution of the district be examined, approved and confirmed by the court. The petition shall set forth a full description of the lands formerly embraced within the district which is affected by the proceedings for the dissolution of such district, shall set forth generally the proceedings taken with reference to the petition and the election specified in the preceding sections of this chapter, and shall set forth fully every item of legal and enforceable indebtedness of the district with the name and residence of the holder thereof so far as known to the district secretary. In case any items of indebtedness are in the hands of unknown owners, they shall be so listed.

§ 42-5267. Character of proceedings for confirmation.

Dissolution proceedings shall be in the nature of a suit to quiet title with respect to so much of the land and/or facilities within the district as is affected by the proposed dissolution. In such proceedings the board shall be the parties plaintiff and the holders of any obligations of the district, including obligations which are or might become liens against any of the lands, are parties defendant. The provisions of section 5-326, Idaho Code, so far as it can be made applicable, shall govern generally the force and effect of the decree; provided, that the petition may be in form against all persons having interest in or claim against the district, without naming them, and the summons, directed in the same way, and setting forth briefly the purposes of the petition, shall be by publication in the first instance or order of the court or a judge thereof and service on all parties interested, whether unknown owners, heirs, devisees, claimants or otherwise, shall be deemed complete at the time prescribed by the order for publication; and, unless answer be made by anyone interested in or making claim against said district default may be entered.

§ 42-5268. Decree of confirmation.

The court or judge shall set a day for the hearing of such petition and if it appears to the court from the proof that there is no such outstanding indebtedness of such district, or in case there is any such indebtedness outstanding that the holders thereof have filed no objections to the proceedings, or have filed their consent thereto, then the court shall enter its decree confirming the said proceedings, or may hear and determine and make decree as to any controversy. The election authorized by the preceding sections of this chapter shall have no force or effect to dissolve any district until confirmed by the decree of court as herein set forth.

§ 42-5269. Dissolution without election — Petition — Conditions.

A ground water district may be dissolved without the holding of the election provided for in this chapter upon complaint or petition of parties holding and owning fifty percent (50%) or more, measured on the basis of cubic feet per second, of all the ground water rights within the district.

It must be made to appear to the satisfaction of the court, by such complaint or petition, that any one (1) or more of the following conditions exist in or as to said district:

The district has been abandoned, or for two (2) or more years last past has ceased to function, and there is little or no probability that it ever will or can function in the future;

No useful purpose exists for the further continuance of the organization of the district; or

There are insufficient members to pay for the costs of operating the district.

§ 42-5270. Dissolution without election — Parties.

In such petition the petitioners or complainants shall be named as plaintiffs and the ground water district, and its directors, if any there are, and all persons having interest in or claim against the district, without naming them, shall be defendants. In the course of the proceedings of said case, and at any time before the final hearing thereof, any person interested may join in said case as a party plaintiff or as a party defendant, or any party interested may intervene in said case without order of the court.

§ 42-5271. Dissolution without election — Appointment of officer to marshal assets — Decree.

In the exercise of the jurisdiction given it by this act, the court shall have the power to appoint such referee, master, auditor, or receiver as may be considered necessary or proper to marshal the assets, and protect or preserve them, or ascertain the true condition of the district. After due hearing and consideration of the evidence submitted, the court shall enter a decree establishing the legal and equitable rights, interests and priorities of all parties and claimants, and may decree and direct the sale of all or any part of the properties of the district, whether real, personal or mixed, and direct the disbursement and application of the proceeds and the payment of the costs of the proceeding, and may dissolve the district, or may approve and confirm any settlement or agreement of settlement made between the parties interested in such district, if a settlement is agreed upon by them, or may direct the payment of the indebtedness of the district in the order of priority determined and established by the decree, through assessments made as in the case of the dissolution of villages, or may grant such other or further relief as may be equitable or proper on the premises.

§ 42-5272. Dissolution — Appeal.

Each party to any proceeding for dissolution of a district under this act shall have the right of appeal as in other civil cases.

§ 42-5273. Consolidation of two or more ground water districts.

Whenever the boards of directors of any two (2) or more ground water districts which together form a contiguous area determine that it is in the best interests of their respective districts that the districts be consolidated into a single ground water district and wish to proceed toward consolidation, the following procedures shall be followed:

Each board shall petition its respective county commission in the counties identified by reference to section 42-5203, Idaho Code, for an order for an election to vote upon the question of such consolidation, which petition shall state in detail the terms upon which such consolidation is proposed to be made, and also shall transmit a copy of the petition to the department of water resources.

Upon receiving the petitions, the department shall investigate questions affecting such proposed consolidation, and it shall make a report of the result of such investigations to each county commission with whom the petitions were filed not more than ninety (90) days after the department receives such petitions.

After receiving the department’s report, each county commission, if it deems it advisable, shall make an order fixing the time for an election in the districts to vote upon the question of proposed consolidation, which time shall be at the first available date in accordance with section 34-106, Idaho Code. Notice of the election shall be published as required for notice of election in section 42-5209, Idaho Code, and the boards of directors shall make all necessary arrangements for such election in their respective districts as provided in this title for other elections. The ballots shall be substantially as follows: “Consolidation—Yes.” “Consolidation—No.”

The boards of directors shall canvass the returns of the election as provided in case of usual ground water district elections, and shall immediately thereafter transmit, by messenger or registered mail, certified abstracts of the result of said election in their respective districts to the clerk of the county commission. Within ten (10) days after such returns are received by the clerk, the county commission shall meet and canvass the same.

If it appears that a majority of all the votes cast in each of said districts is “Consolidation—Yes.” said board shall make an order, and enter the same of record in its minutes, establishing said consolidated district, giving its boundaries and designation, and in detail the terms under which the consolidation has been effected, and dividing said consolidated districts into three (3) divisions, and shall appoint some person qualified under this title, to act as director for each of said divisions of said district until the next general election for the election of officers, when a board of directors shall be elected as provided in section 42-5218, Idaho Code; provided however, that the organization of such district shall not take effect until the first Tuesday of the January following said order of its establishment. If the date provided by law for the election of directors shall come between the date of said order of the county commission and the first Tuesday of January, then in making such order the board shall designate the board of directors of one (1) of the consolidated districts as a board to take charge of such election, and in that case a director shall be elected for each such division of the consolidated district, and no appointment of directors shall be made by the county commission.
(6) If, however, upon such canvass by the county commission, it appears that a majority of the votes cast in any district thus proposed to be consolidated is “Consolidation—No,” then a record of that fact shall be entered in the same minutes of the county commission, and all the proceedings had under the preceding sections of this chapter shall be void.

§ 42-5274. Procedure for consolidating one ground water district within another having substantially larger ground water diversions.

In those cases where the cumulative total ground water diversions (excluding diversions under domestic and stockwater rights) in one (1) district are less than one-tenth (1/10) of such diversions in the larger district, and the boards of directors deem it for the best interests of the respective districts that the two (2) districts be consolidated into a single district, such boards may seek to consolidate according to the following procedure as an alternative to that described in section 42-5273, Idaho Code:

The boards may propose a contract between them setting forth the terms and conditions of consolidating the district having the smaller ground water diversions into the other district, with the name and officers of the district having the larger ground water diversions still retained.

Once both boards have approved the contract, it shall be submitted for approval by the members of the district having the smaller ground water diversions, together with the question of whether the two (2) districts shall be consolidated under the contract’s terms, at a special election held for that purpose in such district. Notice of the election shall be published as required for notices of election for indebtedness. At the election should two-thirds (2/3) of the electors voting, vote in favor of the contract and the consolidation of the districts, the board of directors of the district having the smaller ground water diversions shall petition the board of directors of the district having the larger ground water diversions, which notice shall be published in a newspaper published within the county wherein the office of the board of directors of the district having the larger ground water diversions is situated, for such length of time and covering the same matters as required by a petition to annex land and/or facilities into a district.

The law applicable to the annexation of land into a district after the petition is filed and notice given, shall apply to the consolidation, including an annexation of a smaller district into a larger district.

After the board of directors of the district having the larger ground water diversions has approved the resolution or other decision including within its boundaries the district having the smaller ground water diversions, the board shall file a petition in the district court within the county wherein the principal office of its district is situated, asking for an approval and confirmation of the proceedings thereunder, and the same procedure shall be followed as provided in sections 43-406 through 43-408, Idaho Code, with reference to the confirmation of the proceedings within irrigation districts. In such petition the prayer shall be that the proceedings, together with the contract, may be examined and approved by the court; that after the confirmation of said proceedings the order of the board of directors admitting the smaller district into the district having the larger ground water diversions, containing a description of all the land properly certified by the secretary of the district, shall be filed for record in the office of the recorder of both counties with which the petition was filed.

§ 42-5275. Exercise of powers under this chapter by irrigation districts organized under title 43.

Any irrigation district organized and operating pursuant to title 43, Idaho Code, may exercise the authorities provided under this chapter to the extent doing so does not conflict with any provision of title 43, Idaho Code.

§ 42-5276. Inclusion of irrigation districts organized under title 43.

Where the water supply for lands is ground water provided by an irrigation district established under title 43, Idaho Code, and such lands are included in and subject to assessment by the irrigation district, such lands shall be included in a ground water district organized under the provisions of this chapter only if the board of the irrigation district serves notice in the same manner as that provided for nonirrigators in section 42-5214(2) and (3), Idaho Code.